Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.425

Notice of order of appointment—Rights.

(1) Not later than thirty days after appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.420, the conservator shall give to the individual subject to conservatorship and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420 (6) and (7) a copy of the order of appointment and a statement of the rights of the individual subject to conservatorship and procedures to seek relief if the individual is denied those rights. The statement must be in plain language, in at least sixteen-point font, and to the extent feasible, in a language in which the individual subject to conservatorship is proficient. The statement must notify the individual subject to conservatorship of the right to:

(a) Seek termination or modification of the conservatorship, or removal of the conservator, and choose an attorney to represent the individual in these matters;

(b) Participate in decision making to the extent reasonably feasible;

(c) Receive a copy of the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510, the conservator's inventory under RCW 11.130.515, and the conservator's report under RCW 11.130.530; and

(d) Object to the conservator's inventory, plan, or report.

(2) If a conservator is appointed for the reasons stated in RCW 11.130.360(2)(a)(ii) and the individual subject to conservatorship is missing, notice under this section to the individual is not required.

[ 2024 c 267 s 10; 2020 c 312 s 216; 2019 c 437 s 412.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.